NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.aff
SFX & Y 13
SFX &  0     āks     [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     āka     [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākas    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākam    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākai    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     āku     [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākā     [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     āki     [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākiem   [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākām    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākus    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākos    [āēīo]t
SFX &  0     ākās    [āēīo]t

SFX * Y 10
SFX *  0     ākais   [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajam  [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajai  [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     āko     [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajā   [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākie    [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajiem [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajām  [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajos  [āēīo]t
SFX *  0     ākajās  [āēīo]t


SFX < Y 13
SFX <  t     jošāks     [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošāka     [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākas    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākam    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākai    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošāku     [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākā     [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošāki     [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākiem   [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākām    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākus    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākos    [āēīo]t
SFX <  t     jošākās    [āēīo]t

SFX > Y 10
SFX >  t     jošākais   [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajam  [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajai  [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošāko     [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajā   [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākie    [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajiem [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajām  [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajos  [āēīo]t
SFX >  t     jošākajās  [āēīo]t

SFX , Y 13
SFX ,  t     jamāks     [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamāka     [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākas    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākam    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākai    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamāku     [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākā     [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamāki     [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākiem   [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākām    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākus    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākos    [āēīo]t
SFX ,  t     jamākās    [āēīo]t

SFX . Y 10
SFX .  t     jamākais   [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajam  [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajai  [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamāko     [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajā   [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākie    [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajiem [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajām  [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajos  [āēīo]t
SFX .  t     jamākajās  [āēīo]t


SFX 0 Y 1
SFX 0   0     u     t

SFX J Y 21
SFX J  t   šana   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanas  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanai  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanu   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanā   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanās  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanām  [^sz]t
SFX J  st  šana   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanas  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanai  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanu   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanā   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanās  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanām  [s]t
SFX J  zt  šana   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanas  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanai  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanu   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanā   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanās  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanām  [z]t



SFX d Y 16
SFX d   0   ies      t
SFX d   t   šos      [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sies     [^sz]t
SFX d   t   simies   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sieties  [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sities   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   īšos     [z]t
SFX d   t   īsies    [z]t
SFX d   t   īsimies  [z]t
SFX d   t   īsieties [z]t
SFX d   t   īsities  [z]t
SFX d   st  tīšos     [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsies    [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsimies  [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsieties [s]t
SFX d   st  tīsities  [s]t


SFX g Y 7
SFX g   t   jos     [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jies    [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jās     [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jāmies  [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   jāties  [āēīoū]t
SFX g   0   os      [āēīoū]t
SFX g   t   šoties  [āēīoū]t


SFX A Y 28
SFX A ties jos      .
SFX A ties jies     .
SFX A ties jas      .
SFX A ties jamies   .
SFX A ties jaties   .
SFX A ties jās      .
SFX A ties jāmies   .
SFX A ties jāties   .
SFX A ties šos      .
SFX A ties sies     .
SFX A ties simies   .
SFX A ties sieties  .
SFX A ties sities   .
SFX A ties jieties  .
SFX A ties tos      .
SFX A ties joties   .
SFX A ties šoties   .
SFX A ties damies   .
SFX A ties damās    .
SFX A ties jošies   .
SFX A ties jošos    .
SFX A ties jošās    .
SFX A ties jusies   .
SFX A ties jušies   .
SFX A ties jušos    .
SFX A ties jušās    .
SFX A ties šanos    .
SFX A ties šanās    .

SFX D Y 50
SFX D āties  os     [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ies    [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ās     [ā]ties
SFX D āties  āmies  [ā]ties
SFX D āties  āties  [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ieties [ā]ties
SFX D āties  oties  [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ošies  [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ošos   [ā]ties
SFX D āties  ošās   [ā]ties
SFX D ēties  os     [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  ies    [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  as     [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  amies  [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  aties  [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  ieties [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  oties  [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  ošies  [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  ošos   [ē]ties
SFX D ēties  ošās   [ē]ties
SFX D īties  os     [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ies    [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ās     [ī]ties
SFX D īties  āmies  [ī]ties
SFX D īties  āties  [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ieties [ī]ties
SFX D īties  oties  [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ošies  [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ošos   [ī]ties
SFX D īties  ošās   [ī]ties
SFX D ies    os      [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jos     [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jies    [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jās     [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jāmies  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jāties  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   šos     [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   sies    [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   sieties [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   simies  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   sities  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   damies  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   damās   [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jusies  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jušies  [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jušos   [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   jušās   [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   šanos   [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   šanās   [āēī]ties
SFX D ties   šoties  [āēī]ties



SFX T Y 15
SFX T   t   os      [^s]t
SFX T   t   ies     [^s]t
SFX T   t   ās      [^s]t
SFX T   t   āmies   [^s]t
SFX T   t   āties   [^s]t
SFX T   t  os     [^īū][s]t
SFX T   t  ies    [^īū][^s]t
SFX T   t  ās     [^īū][^s]t
SFX T   t  āmies  [^īū][^s]t
SFX T   t  āties  [^īū][^s]t
SFX T   st  dos     [īū][s]t
SFX T   st  dies    [īū][s]t
SFX T   st  dās     [īū][s]t
SFX T   st  dāmies  [īū][s]t
SFX T   st  dāties  [īū][s]t


SFX R Y 8
SFX R   t  stos     t
SFX R   t  sties    t
SFX R   t  stas     t
SFX R   t  stamies  t
SFX R   t  staties  t
SFX R   t  stieties t
SFX R   t  stoties  t
SFX R   t  šoties   t









SFX O Y 10
SFX O  s  a   [s]
SFX O  s  am  [s]
SFX O  s  u   [s]
SFX O  s  ā   [s]
SFX O  s  0   [s]
SFX O  š  a    [š]
SFX O  š  am   [š]
SFX O  š  u    [š]
SFX O  š  ā    [š]
SFX O  š  0    [š]

SFX i Y 8
SFX i  s  i    [s]
SFX i  s  iem  [s]
SFX i  s  us   [s]
SFX i  s  os   [s]
SFX i  š  i    [š]
SFX i  š  iem  [š]
SFX i  š  us   [š]
SFX i  š  os   [š]

SFX t Y 24
SFX t  s   iņ    [^gk]s
SFX t  gs  dziņ  [g]s
SFX t  ks  ciņ   [k]s
SFX t  s   iņš   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iņa   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iņam  [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iņu   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iņā   [^gk]s
SFX t  gs  dziņš   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziņa   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziņam  [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziņu   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziņā   [g]s
SFX t  ks  ciņš   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciņa   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciņam  [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciņu   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciņā   [k]s
SFX t  š   iņš   [š]
SFX t  š   iņa   [š]
SFX t  š   iņam  [š]
SFX t  š   iņu   [š]
SFX t  š   iņā   [š]
SFX t  š   iņ    [š]

SFX v Y 16
SFX v  s   iņi   [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iņus  [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iņiem [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iņos  [^gk]s
SFX v  gs  dziņi   [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziņus  [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziņiem [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziņos  [g]s
SFX v  ks  ciņi     [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciņus    [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciņiem   [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciņos    [k]s
SFX v  š   iņi     [š]
SFX v  š   iņus    [š]
SFX v  š   iņiem   [š]
SFX v  š   iņos    [š]

SFX o Y 4
SFX o  0   em   [i]  
SFX o  i   os   [i]
SFX o  i   u    [i]
SFX o  i   us   [i]
