NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
Edgars/Oitv
Ignats/Oitv
Magnuss/Oitv
Roderiks/Oitv
Virķēni/o
aizgrabināties/+D
aizknikšķināties/D+
aizspiest/NJ0
aizsākt/M(+9hJ}TdIB[8]4
aizurdzēt/bBC+(hJI1M
aizvicināties/D+
albumīns/Oi
alusbārs/Oi
amplificēt/g+JIbH)MdBG$p1[]{
apakšgals/Oitv
apeļļot/+{bdHGg1BI)J[M]p
apgreznot/J.I+)1$b,HBM
apgult/+^dBMRIe7Z5[J]
apkaunot/GHgbI+)Bd<>[1J{M$p]
apkniest/MJ0
apkurcuši/o+
aplasīt/*+(hbBIM&1JC
aplidot/1bI*JM+&B$H.),
apmīstīt/Ih(+bJBCM1
aprimt/+ed^JMTIB7]Z[R4
apspert/B06+5
apstiprināt/+(1bIBh*MJ&C
apstrīdēt/}hg+dJI*(H&$B)bcM1[C]{
apsukāt/.I1g+b)$M]J[p,dGBH{
aptarkšķināt/+bJ[(ghBIcd}C{1M]
aptempt/TJdpM[]
apvainot/$+<Bd>gHbGI)J1{M.,[p]
apšķiest/JN0
apžāvēt/$[H+IBd)J1bp{GgM]
arums/Oitv
atbruņot/+Id>$1Bb[J)GM<{gHp]
atgūt/+R7B9Id4MZ^J[]
atjaunināt/b+&BI(C*hMJ1
atkarāties/A+
atkosts/O
atkrāmēt/+1gI$)*{J]b&dBMGH[p
atmāvuši/o+
atriest/M0J
atsmirdēt/+hC(BIMb1J
atstostīt/c+Mhb(Ig[J]1d{BC
atsākt/h+}J](I9TB[dM48
augšupielādēt/)+d.,G[$JBIpbHg1{M]
aulekšot/+gHbGdBI{J$[)M1]p
bazārs/Oi
biedēt/+I$<g1MdBp>)G[bHJ]{
blandīties/D+
brēcējs/Oi
cūkgans/Oitv
dangains/WiYX
darboties/+A
defokusēt/I&*+)G.M,[J]$dbgH1B{p
dehidrēt/+J$I1g&*dbpB){[HMG]
demontēt/Ib+)$GMBdJ,.]gp[{H1
dinamisms/O
disciplinēt/+JI$*gHp)bdBM][&G{1
domāt/g+IBd$>JH)bGM1{[p<]
dzēst/JM0
elst/+eI3F]T
fascinēt/I+B>H)$<b1JM
finālposms/O
frīzs/Oi
gremzdi/o
gulsnēt/b+).BIHg1,[$JGMd{p]
gult/e+IZ^R7dB[5JM]
iebarotājs/Oix
iecerēt/+I&*B(bJCh1M
iecienīt/+bJ(&hd]gIcB1*[M{C
iedīdīt/B+dIc&(hbg{*J]1MC[
iejādināt/+(bIBhMgJc{dC[]1}
iekarāties/+A
ielavīties/D+
ielīgot/+)I{b$JB1G[d]HgpM
iestudēt/+J)$IB.,1bMH
iesvilt/^e+Z7BRITd[4JM]
ievingrināt/+IhdbB([gMcC1}{J]
iezelt/+B605
informēt/G)+<b[g>1dI]JBHM${p&*
izbuktēt/+{[b$,dBIG*.Mg&H)J]1p
izcept/+h(eTI}dBJ4[8]M
izciešoši/o+
izdangāt/[$+)BdIb&*J]G{1HgpM
izdefilēt/b+)M$I1HBJ
izdomājums/Oi
izgulēt/hb+gd1BIM*&J]{[
izkašķēties/+A
izklaigāt/$)Ib1B+Gg[dJM{Hp]
izkņudināties/D+
izsacītājs/Oix
izsekot/.+)B,IMHb1J$
izsēdēt/+cIgdhb{B&*[J}]1M
izsūdzēt/([+hc}dMIJB1gb{C]
izzināt/+b(hBI&JCM*1
izālēties/A+
izčāpstināties/D+
jaukums/Oitv
jozt/IT6+2eBd[]4
jūsmināt/b(hBIJ+1MC
kaļoši/o+
kniedēt/Id+p$bg)[B{JHGM1]
komandēt/+J$bBI),H.1M
kondomināts/Oi
kristāmtrauks/Oi
kāst/JM0
laiks/Oitv+
langusts/Oitv
līdzdarboties/+A
mierināt/+&h*JBbI(1MC
mobilizēt/GI$+b<>)JdBpMgH{[1]
moralizēt/+b.J$I*,H)B&1M
mucinieks/Oix
mānītājs/Oix
mīļot/+d1gMG)b$*[&HIpBJ{]
nepasmelti/o
nest/(+eIJF}hM]T
nodraiskoties/+A
noecēt/dI+b)]JG{[$B1gHMp
nogribēties/D+
nogult/Ied+RM^]JZ7B5[
noklauvēt/+Gb[{d$BHI)g1Mp]J
nolīnijot/+)IB1$JbHM
nopuņķoties/A+
nopētīt/bB+*&I)$d,[(Gg.J]1{HpM
nosmējuši/+o
nospraust/JN0
nosprostot/$+b)&HJIB*M1
novemstīties/+D
nozīst/6+I2E]b[T
nožagoties/A+
nāvēt/+$[bBIHgJ)Mpd<>{G1]
orgāns/Oitv
oriģinālromāns/Oi
ozonators/Oitv
pabojāt/+bG[gI1$pdB)HJM{]
pabozt/MIJ6Ted24[]B
padūmot/+b1I)$HJMB
pagult/IBd+eRJZ^7]5M[
painteresēties/+A
palielināt/+IhMCb(JB1*&
pamatot/+&bIJ,.*dHB1g$)GM{[p]
paredzētājs/Oix
paskābinināt/+cgB}10d{[C]
pastarpināt/+Ih1(BbJ*&MC
pasūkstīties/D+
patikt/+dI4TBJ]3M[
patinami/o+
pazemot/+<Bd$>gMI[)bG1HJ{p]
pazīt/+dR9ZJ[BI74M]^
paēnot/HgbG+J)M$pIB1d{[]
paīgņoties/A+
paņerkstēt/h+g(BbIcCdJM[1{}]
piegulēt/d+IgbB{hJ1M[]
piemērot/+dI{)*JMG,[].1g$Bbp&H
pieplivināties/+D
pierimt/^+IeZBdM4T7R[J]
piesnaust/N0J
piesūcināt/c+Jdbhg*}BI[(C1&{M]
pietrūkt/+97RIZMJdT4B^][
piezeļoši/o+
plakāts/Oitv
progresēt/$Hb+)><IB1JM
projicēt/)I+J$Bb{dMH1g[G]p
puķupods/Oitv
pārdrāzt/JBIeT6d2M[4]
pārirt/h+5([6dIeB]}
pārkarāties/+A
pārpumpēt/db+)$*&IH,.pgJG{MB[]1
pārsaldēt/+$gH)Ib1BGJ{dpM[]
pārspraust/JN0
pārvads/Oitv
pārvilinājums/Oi
pārziemot/+$JbIB)H.1,M
pāršalkot/+HbJ)1IB$M
pāršķīruši/o+
rafinēt/dJ+)BI1G{H$b*gM&[p]
resursdators/Oi
rimt/^+eZI7RBTM4d[J]
rosīties/D+
sabārt/%+eT6]BdI[4
sadauzīt/+BdIJ]bg1(chM{C[
sadraiskoties/+A
saliedēt/+G)b.B&{<>I*$H,gM1[dpJ]
samurgot/+1I$,.Bb)JMH
sapumpēt/+[)*gdGH$1IBb{&JMp]
saskaņot/b+1g[.),dBMJ*$&GHI]{p
saspiest/JN0
sastrēgst/+0
sasvērt/+Ie%BT46d[]
satrinoši/o+
satupt/+B7T4dJI[eZ^MR]
savietot/.+$*H&)Mgpb]JdIB{G,[1
sazināt/&+bhc(dCM*BgJ[I]}{1
slaists/Oitv
slinkums/Oitv
spēlētājs/Oix
stabilizēt/+{>bgBdGI)$1<J[H]Mp
starpsaimnieks/Oix
stomīties/+D
teatralizēt/HbBI+J1)$.M,
tinums/Oitv
topāzs/Oitv
uzcilāt/+dIB)GgbJ1H${M[]p
uzdarboties/+A
uzfrizēt/+$I1gM[BbG)J{dH]p
uzgult/+5dB^IRMeZ7[J]
uzlekt/9B+%560
uzlikt/9+7d[MTIJ]4B
uzpircējs/Oi
uzritināt/dB+[Ihc1(Jgb{]}CM
uzspilgtināt/d+gI&*}hcBbJM[({C1]
veldzēt/+G)b$JIB<Hg>{M]1[pd
vijīgums/Oi
zvērināt/Mb&*1(BI+hCJ
zēns/Oitv
zīmējums/Oitv
ēvelēt/$+IBHb)J1M
ūdensnesējhorizonts/Oi
Žīguri/o
